Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
PART 2 Rights and Privileges as to Manner of Habilitation and as to Maintenance and Release of Clinical Records

Cross references.

When medical information may be released, §

24-12-1

.

Disclosure of medical records, §

24-12-11

et seq.

37-4-120.
Individual dignity of clients to be respected; use of criminal facilities and procedures.

The client’s dignity as an individual shall be respected at all times and upon all occasions, including any occasion wherein the client is taken into custody, detained, or transported. Except where required under conditions of extreme urgency, those procedures,
facilities, vehicles, and restraining devices normally utilized for criminals or those accused of crime shall not be used in connection with the developmentally disabled.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2503.2, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-5/HB 228.

37-4-121.
Securing of least restrictive alternative placement; assisting client in securing placement in noninstitutional community facilities and programs.

It is the policy of the state that the least restrictive alternative placement be secured for every client at every stage of his habilitation. It shall be the duty of the facility to assist the client in securing placement in noninstitutional community
facilities and programs.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2503.21, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1.

37-4-122.
Client’s care and treatment rights.

Each client in a facility and each person receiving services for a developmental disability shall receive habilitation that is suited to his needs and is the least restrictive appropriate habilitation. Such habilitation shall be administered skillfully,
safely, and humanely with full respect for his dignity and personal integrity.

In order to assure proper habilitation, it shall be the duty of the superintendent or regional state hospital administrator of a facility to ensure that each client receives such medical attention as is suitable to his condition.

Each client shall have the right to participate in his habilitation. The department shall issue regulations to ensure that each client participates in his habilitation to the maximum extent possible. Unless the disclosure to the client is determined by
the superintendent or regional state hospital administrator or person having charge of the client’s habilitation to be detrimental to the physical or mental health of the client and unless a notation to that effect is made a part
of the client’s record, the client shall have the right to reasonable access to review his medical file, to be told his diagnosis, to be consulted on the habilitation recommendation, and to be fully informed concerning his medication,
including its side effects and available treatment alternatives.

If a client admitted to a facility under this chapter is able to secure the services of a private physician or psychologist, he shall be allowed to see his physician or psychologist at any reasonable time. The superintendent or regional state hospital
administrator is authorized and directed to establish regulations designed to facilitate examination and treatment which a client may request from such private physician or psychologist.

Every client admitted to a facility under this chapter shall be examined by the staff of the admitting facility as soon as possible after his admission.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2503.4, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1059, § 25; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-19; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-7/HB 228.

Law reviews.

For note on 1991 amendment of this Code section, see 8 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 121 (1992).

37-4-123.
Recognition of clients’ physical integrity; rights to refuse medication; obtaining consent to treatment and surgery; performance of emergency surgery; immunity of physician; direction of notice of actions taken under Code section.

It shall be the policy of this state to recognize the personal physical integrity of all clients.

It shall be the policy of this state to protect reasonably the right of every individual to refuse medication, except in cases where a physician determines that refusal would be unsafe to the client or others. If the client continues to refuse medication
after such initial emergency treatment, a concurring opinion from a second physician must be obtained before medication can be continued without the client’s consent. Further, in connection with any hearing under this chapter,
the client has the right to appear and testify as free from any side effects or adverse effects of the medication as is reasonably possible.

Any client objecting to the treatment being administered to him shall have a right to request a protective order pursuant to Code Section 37-4-108.

Except as provided in subsections (b) and (e) of this Code section, consent to medical treatment and surgery shall be obtained and regulated by Chapter 9 of Title 31.

In cases of grave emergency where the medical staff of the facility in which a developmentally disabled person has been accepted for habilitation determines that immediate surgical or other intervention is necessary to prevent serious physical consequences
or death and where delay in obtaining consent would create a grave danger to the physical health of such person, as determined by at least two physicians, then essential surgery or other intervention may be administered without
the consent of the person, the spouse, next of kin, attorney, guardian, or any other person. In such cases, a record of the determination of the physicians shall be entered into the medical records of the client and this will be
proper consent for such surgery or other intervention. Such consent will be valid, notwithstanding the type of admission of the client, and it shall also be valid whether or not the client has been adjudged incompetent. This Code
section is intended to have application to those individuals who, as a result of their advanced age, impaired thinking, or other disability, cannot reasonably understand the consequences of withholding consent to surgery or other
intervention as contemplated by this Code section. Any physician, agent, employee, or official who obtains consent or relies on such consent as authorized by this Code section and who acts in good faith and within the provisions
of this chapter shall be immune from civil or criminal liability for his actions in connection with said obtaining or relying upon such consent. Actual notice of any action taken pursuant to this Code section shall be given to
the client and the spouse, next of kin, attorney, guardian, or representative of the client as soon as practically possible.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2516, enacted by Ga. L. 1977, p. 886, § 1; Code 1933, § 88-2503.6, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 1302, § 13; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 3-5/HB 228.

37-4-124.
Mistreatment, neglect, or abuse of clients prohibited; use of medication, physical restraints, or seclusion restricted; standards for use of physical restraints.

Mistreatment, neglect, or abuse in any form of any client is prohibited. Medication in quantities that interfere with the client’s habilitation program is prohibited. All medication, seclusion, or physical restraints are to be used solely for the purposes
of providing effective habilitation and protecting the safety of the client and other persons. Restraints shall not be employed as punishment, for the convenience of the staff, or as a substitute for programs.

Physical restraints shall not be applied unless:

A person who is involved in the care and treatment of the client as a physician, psychologist, or clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health determines such restraints to be necessary in order to prevent a client from seriously injuring himself
or herself or others; or

A professional staff member determines that there exists an emergency requiring the use of such restraints. For purposes of this Code section, an emergency exists when the client presents an immediate danger of injury to himself or herself or others.
The authorization of physical restraints by a professional staff member shall be immediately reported to a physician and any psychologist involved in the care and treatment of the client. A physician’s, psychologist’s,
or clinical nurse specialist’s in psychiatric/mental health order for restraints shall expire after 12 hours, at which time a new determination of the need for restraints must be made. The physician, psychologist involved
in the care and treatment of the client, or clinical nurse specialist in psychiatric/mental health involved in the care and treatment of the client must issue a written order for each use of restraints. The facility shall
have written policies and procedures which govern the use of such restraints and which clearly delineate, in descending order, the personnel who can authorize the use of restraints in emergency situations.

Every use of physical restraints shall be made a part of the resident’s clinical record. The following shall be documented in the record:

The reasons for applying the restraint;

The signature of the person authorizing the restraint;

The time of application and removal of the restraint; and

A record of checks at least every 30 minutes by a staff member trained in use of restraints and the signature of the person making such checks. A copy of each use of restraint shall be forwarded to the superintendent or regional state hospital administrator
for review.

For the purposes of this Code section, those devices which restrain movement but are applied for protection from accidental injury or are required for the medical treatment of the client’s physical condition or for supportive or corrective needs of the
client shall not be considered physical restraints. However, devices used in such situations must be authorized and applied in compliance with the facility’s policies and procedures. The use of any such devices shall be recorded
in writing as a part of the client’s individualized program plan.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2503.5, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 734, § 2; Ga. L. 1982, p. 3, § 37; Ga. L. 1997, p. 911, § 5; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-19.

Cross references.

Abuse and mistreatment of hospital patients, residents of long-term care facilities, and other institutions, §§ 31-7-9, 31-8-50 et seq., 31-8-80 et seq., 31-8-100 et seq.

37-4-125.
Treatment of clinical records; scope of privileged communications; liability for disclosure.

A clinical record for each client shall be maintained. Authorized release of the record shall include but not be limited to examination of the original record, copies of all or any portion of the record, or disclosure of information from the record, except
for matters privileged under the laws of this state. Such examination shall be conducted on hospital premises at reasonable times determined by the facility. The clinical record shall not be a public record and no part of it
shall be released except:

When the superintendent or regional state hospital administrator of the facility where the record is kept deems it essential for continued habilitation, a copy of the record or parts thereof may be released to persons in charge of a client’s habilitation
when and as necessary for the habilitation of the client;

A copy of the record may be released to any person or entity designated in writing by the client or, if appropriate, the parent of a minor, the legal guardian of an adult or minor, or a person to whom legal custody of a minor client has been given by
order of a court;

(2.1)
A copy of the record of a deceased client or deceased former client may be released to or in response to a valid subpoena of a coroner or medical examiner under Chapter 16 of Title 45, except for matters
privileged under the laws of this state;

When the habilitation plan of the client involves transfer of that client to another facility or involves the receipt of community services by the client, a copy of the record may be released to that facility or to that entity rendering such community
services;

A copy of the record or any part thereof may be disclosed to any employee or staff member of the facility when it is necessary for the proper habilitation of the client;

A copy of the record shall be released to the client’s attorney if the attorney so requests and the client, or the client’s legal guardian, consents to the release;

In a bona fide medical emergency, as determined by a physician treating the client, the superintendent or regional state hospital administrator may release a copy of the record to the treating physician;

At the request of the client, the client’s legal guardian, or the client’s attorney, the record shall be produced by the entity having custody thereof at any hearing held under this chapter;

A copy of the record shall be produced in response to a valid subpoena or order of any court of competent jurisdiction, except for matters privileged under the laws of this state;

(8.1)
A copy of the record may be released to the legal representative of a deceased client’s estate, except for matters privileged under the laws of this state;

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a law enforcement officer in the course of a criminal investigation may be informed as to whether a person is or has been a client in a state facility, as well as the client’s current address,
if known;

A copy of the client’s clinical record may be released under the conditions and for the uses and purposes set forth in Code Section 31-7-6; and

Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, a law enforcement officer in the course of investigating the commission of a crime on the premises of a facility covered by this chapter or against facility personnel or a threat to commit such
a crime may be informed as to the circumstances of the incident, including whether the individual allegedly committing or threatening to commit a crime is or has been a client in the facility, and the name, address, and
last known whereabouts of any alleged client perpetrator.

In connection with any hearing held under this chapter, any physician, including any psychiatrist, or any psychologist who is treating or who has treated the client shall be authorized to give evidence as to any matter concerning the client, including
evidence as to communications otherwise privileged under Code Section 24-5-501, 24-12-1, or 43-39-16.

Any disclosure authorized by this Code section or any unauthorized disclosure of confidential or privileged client information or communications shall not in any way abridge or destroy the confidential or privileged character thereof, except for the purpose
for which such authorized disclosure is made. Any person making a disclosure authorized by subsection (a) of this Code section shall not be liable to the client or any other person, notwithstanding any contrary provision of Code
Section 24-5-501, 24-12-1, or 43-39-16.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2503.12, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 734, § 3; Ga. L. 1991, p. 1059, § 26; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1072, § 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-19; Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 54/HB 24.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2011, p. 99, § 101/HB 24, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that this Act shall apply to any motion made or hearing or trial commenced on or after January 1, 2013.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 1994, a semicolon was substituted for a period at the end of paragraph (a)(8.1).

Cross references.

Release of medical information generally, § 24-9-40 et seq.

Law reviews.

For note on 1991 amendment of this Code section, see 8 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 121 (1992).

For article, “Evidence,” see 27 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2011).

For article on the 2011 amendment of this Code section, see 28 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 1 (2011).

37-4-126.
Right of client to examine his records and to request correction of inaccuracies; promulgation of rules and regulations; judicial supervision of files and records relating to proceedings under this chapter.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of Code Section 37-4-122, every client shall have the right to examine all medical records kept in the client’s name by the department or the facility where the client was receiving services.

Every client shall have the right to request that the department or facility correct any inaccurate information found in his medical record.

The board shall promulgate reasonable rules and regulations to implement subsections (a) and (b) of this Code section. Nothing contained in this Code section shall be construed to require the deletion of information by the department nor constrain the
department from destroying client records after a reasonable passage of time.

Notwithstanding paragraphs (7) and (8) of Code Section 15-9-37, all files and records of a court in a proceeding under this chapter shall remain sealed and shall be open to inspection only upon order of the court, issued after notice to the client and
subject to the provisions of Code Section 37-4-125 pertaining to the medical portions of the record, provided that the court may refer to such files and records in any subsequent proceeding under this chapter concerning the same
client, on condition that the files and records of such subsequent proceeding will then be sealed in accordance with this subsection. The court may permit authorized representatives of recognized organizations compiling statistics
for proper purposes to inspect and make abstracts from official records but without personal identifying information and under whatever conditions upon their use and distribution that the court may deem proper, and the court may
punish by contempt any violations of those conditions. Otherwise, inspection of the sealed files and records may be permitted only by an order of the court upon petition by the person who is the subject of the records and only
by those persons named in the order.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2503.13, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1.

Cross references.

Release of medical information generally, §

24-12-1

et seq.

37-4-127.
Right of client’s attorney to interview persons in charge of client’s habilitation in a facility; establishment of regulations as to release of information to client’s attorney.

The client’s attorney shall have the right, at reasonable times, to interview the persons in charge of the client’s habilitation in any facility and to have the client’s records interpreted by them. The superintendent or regional state hospital administrator
is authorized and directed to establish reasonable regulations to make available to the client’s attorney all such information in the possession of the facility as the attorney requires in order to advise and represent the client concerning
his habilitation.

History.
Code 1933, § 88-2503.20, enacted by Ga. L. 1978, p. 1826, § 1; Ga. L. 2002, p. 1324, § 1-19.

Cross references.

Release of medical information generally, §

24-12-1

et seq.